District of Columbia statutes.
50-2602

Definitions.

When used in this subchapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)

The term “District” means the District of Columbia.

(2)

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

(3)

Repealed.

(4)

The term “parking facilities” means 1 or more public off-street parking areas for motor vehicles, including necessary structures.

(5)

The term “motor vehicle” means any device propelled by an internal combustion engine, electricity, or steam. The term “motor vehicle” shall not include traction engines, road rollers, vehicles propelled only upon rails or tracks, personal mobility devices, as defined by § 50-2201.02(12), or a battery-operated wheelchair when operated by a person with a disability.

(6)

Repealed.

(7)

Repealed.

History

Feb. 16, 1942, 56 Stat. 91, ch. 76, § 2
Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-108, § 3(a), 27 DCR 3781
Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-176, § 8, 32 DCR 748
Feb. 28, 1996, D.C. Law 11-95, § 2, 42 DCR 7180
Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-235,§ 12, 49 DCR 9788
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 13(d), 50 DCR 6579
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 90(a), 51 DCR 881
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-175, § 4(a), 53 DCR 6499
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-224, § 210, 53 DCR 10225

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-804.
1973 Ed., § 90-803.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-235 rewrote par. (5).
D.C. Law 15-35 repealed pars. (6) and (7).
D.C. Law 15-105, in par. (3) validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-175 repealed par. (3).
D.C. Law 16-224, in par. (5), revived the provisions of D.C. Law 14-235 that expired on October 1, 2005, and substituted “personal mobility devices, as defined by § 50-2201.02(12), or a battery-operated wheelchair when operated by a person with a disability” for “electric personal assistive mobility devices, as defined by § 50-2201.02(12), and battery-operated wheelchairs when operated by a handicapped person at speeds not exceeding 10 miles per hour”.
D.C. Law 16-305, in par. (5), purported to substitute “person with a disability” for “handicapped person”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12 of Motor Vehicle Definition Electric Personal Assistive Mobility Device Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-85, April 4, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 3344).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 13(d) of the Removal and Disposition of Abandoned, Dangerous and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 15-104, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5534).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 13(d) of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12 of Motor Vehicle Definition Electric Personal Assistive Mobility Device Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-237, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 249).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12 of Motor Vehicle Definition Electric Personal Assistive Mobility Device Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-323, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2567).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 210 of Personal Mobility Device Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-528, December 4, 2006, 53 DCR 9826).

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 14-235

Section 14 of D.C. Law 14-235 provided that the act shall expire on October 1, 2005.

Editor's Notes

Motor Vehicle Parking Agency abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-2604.